Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.150

Cooperation with legislative committees and others.

The joint committee shall cooperate, act, and function with legislative committees and with the councils or committees of other states similar to this joint committee and with other interstate research organizations.

[ 1996 c 288 s 22; 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 18; 1951 c 43 s 7.]